Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.110

Business license—System to include additional licenses.

(1) In addition to the licenses processed under the business licensing system prior to April 1, 1982, on July 1, 1982, use of the business licensing system is expanded as provided by this section.

(2) Applications for the following must be filed with the business licensing service and must be processed, and renewals must be issued, under the business licensing system:

(a) Nursery dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.13 RCW;

(b) Seed dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.49 RCW;

(c) Pesticide dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.58 RCW;

(d) Shopkeeper's licenses required by chapter 18.64 RCW;

(e) Egg dealer's licenses required by chapter 69.25 RCW; and

(f) Cannabis-infused edible endorsements required by chapter 69.07 RCW.

[ 2022 c 16 s 23; 2017 c 138 s 3; 2013 c 144 s 25; 2007 c 52 s 1; 2000 c 171 s 43; 1988 c 5 s 3; 1982 c 182 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.